Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 6
MEMORIALS

Section

29-6-101. Erection of memorial buildings.

Any county, city and county, city, or town of the state of Colorado, including any city under special charter, has the power, by a vote of the taxpayers, to purchase or condemn ground for, erect and equip, or purchase and equip a building as a soldiers', sailors', and marines' memorial, commemorative of their military and naval service. Such building may be or include military headquarters, memorial rooms, library, assembly hall, gymnasium, natatorium, club rooms, and rest rooms. It may include a city hall and offices for any county or municipal purpose, community house, or recreation center; or it may be a memorial hospital; or it may be for any one or more of such purposes; and for similar or appropriate purposes may be extended to general community and neighborhood uses, all under the control and regulation as to charges and otherwise of the city or town council, or the board of county commissioners of a county. Such buildings may be erected as an appropriate annex to any other city or public building or by reconstructing the same.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 599, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8247.

CSA:

C. 154, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 131-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 131-4-1.

29-6-102. Bond issue.

For the purpose of providing for the acquisition of necessary ground therefor and purchasing, erecting, constructing, or reconstructing such building and for the necessary equipment therefor, the county, city and county, city, or town may issue bonds to be known as liberty memorial bonds, to be issued and sold as provided by law; and the county, city and county, city, or town shall provide for portions of such bonds to become due at different, definite periods, but none in less than five nor more than fifty years from the date of issue.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 600, § 2.

C.L.

§ 8248.

CSA:

C. 154, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 131-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 131-4-2.

29-6-103. Gifts and bequests authorized.

Gifts and bequests to the county, city and county, city, or town for any of the purposes provided in this article are authorized. The same shall be used and applied as provided in this article and as especially stipulated by the donor.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 600, § 3.

C.L.

§ 8249.

CSA:

C. 154, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 131-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 131-4-3.